District of Columbia statutes.
47-1817.07a

Tax on capital gain from the sale or exchange of a Qualified High Technology Company investment.

For tax years beginning after December 31, 2018, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and in lieu of the tax imposed by §§ 47-1806.03(a)(7)(A), 47-1807.02(a)(4), and 47-1808.03(a)(4), the tax on a capital gain from the sale or exchange of an investment in a Qualified High Technology Company, as defined in § 47-1817.01(5)(A), shall be at the rate of 3% if:

(1)

The investment was made after [March 11, 2015];

(2)

The investment was held by the investor for at least 24 continuous months;

(3)

At the time of the investment, the stock of the Qualified High Technology Company was not publicly traded; and

(4)

The investment is in common or preferred stock of the Qualified High Technology Company.

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-210, § 2(b), 61 DCR 13072